Wyoming, session 2025, HB0340.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-2-1038 is created to read:

9-2-1038. Acceptance and expenditure of federal funds
prohibited.

HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
(a) As used in this section, "state entity" means the
state of Wyoming, an agency, department, instrumentality or
other entity of the state of Wyoming, community colleges
and the University of Wyoming.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
state entity shall accept, appropriate, disburse or expend
money or other funds from the government of the United
States or any department or agency of the government of the
United States.

(c) Any state entity that violates subsection (b) of
this section shall, not later than June 30 of the
applicable year, remit to the state treasurer an amount of
general funds equal to the federal funds that the state
entity accepted, disbursed or expended. The state treasurer
shall deposit any funds received under this subsection to
the general fund.

(d) On July 1, 2026, each state entity that is in
possession of federal funds shall transfer any unexpended,
unobligated federal funds that were accepted by,
appropriated or disbursed to or otherwise held by the state
HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
entity to the state auditor. Upon receipt of federal funds
under this subsection and not later than September 1, 2026,
the state auditor shall return, revert or transfer funds,
as applicable, to the United States in accordance with the
laws and rules of the United States.

(e) To the extent that the prohibition in subsection
(b) of this section conflicts with any other provision of
law, this section shall control and supersede those other
provisions.

Section 2. W.S. 9-1-208(a)(i), 9-1-209(b)(ii), (iv)
and (c), 9-1-210 and 9-2-1005(b)(intro), (ii)(intro) and
(p) are amended to read:

9-1-208. Prior approval of governor required.

(a) No state department, board, commission or agency
whose director, board or commission members are appointed
by the governor shall, without prior approval of the
governor:

HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
(i) Apply for federal funds or private endowment
funds;

9-1-209. Coordinator of state-federal relations;
appointment; removal; employment of personnel; duties;
information to be supplied by agencies.

(b) The coordinator shall:

(ii) Aid, assist and advise the governor on all
federal aid and private endowment programs;

(iv) Collect data and information on federal aid
and private endowment programs and maintain a central
depository for the data and information relating to all
programs, including the cost of the state or local
participation. This information shall be available to all
state agencies and units of local government;

(c) All state departments, boards and commissions
shall provide to the coordinator information and data
requested by the coordinator, including cost of programs,
of all federal aid or private endowment programs in which
HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
they participate. This information and data shall be
supplied the coordinator within forty-five (45) days from
the date of request unless more time is granted by the
coordinator.

9-1-210. State authorized to accept gifts.

The state, through the governor may accept gifts, grants,
funds or assistance from any federal, state or local
governmental agencies or from any private source.

9-2-1005. Payment of warrants; budget powers of
governor; agency budgets; federal funds; new employees.

(b) Subject to subsections (c), (g) and (q) of this
section, the governor may:

(ii) Authorize revisions, changes,
redistributions or increases to amounts authorized for
expenditure by legislative appropriation acts from fund
sources identified in W.S. 9-4-204(t) as special revenue
funds, capital project funds, debt service funds or
proprietary fund types, and from federal funds as provided
HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, subsections (g)
and (q) of this section and W.S. 9-4-206, if in his opinion
a public welfare emergency exists, general fund
appropriations can be conserved, agency program
requirements have significantly changed or unanticipated
revenues from fund sources specified in this paragraph
become available and qualify pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1006(a).
For any revision, change, redistribution or increase in
amounts authorized for expenditure under this paragraph in
excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), the
governor's office shall:

(p) The governor shall make available monthly for
public inspection information on the exercise of his
authority under paragraphs (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (v) and
(vi) and subsection (g) of this section and under W.S.
9-2-1014.2 and 9-2-1014.3 for the immediately preceding
month. The information shall be made available on the
Wyoming public finance and expenditure of funds website
created by W.S. 9-2-3220(a).

HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
Section 3. W.S. 9-1-209(b)(v), 9-2-1005(a)(xi),
(b)(iii), (c)(i)(C), (g), (q) and (r), 9-4-206(b) and
9-4-207(b) are repealed.

Section 4.

(a) This act shall not apply to any federal funds
that have been previously appropriated, disbursed or
expended by the state of Wyoming before July 1, 2026. As of
the effective date of this section, no state entity shall
accept, appropriate, disburse or expend any federal funds.

(b) This act shall not be construed to alter, amend
or impair any contract or agreement entered into before
July 1, 2026.

(c) To the extent that any legislation enacted in the
2026 Budget Session appropriates federal funds in violation
of this act, the provisions of this act shall control and
supersede that conflicting legislation.

Section 5.

HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
(a) Not later than October 1, 2025, each state
entity, as defined by W.S. 9-2-1038(a), as created by
section 1 of this act, shall:

(i) Account for any federal funds that have been
received by or disbursed to the state entity on or before
July 1, 2025;

(ii) Attempt to reclaim or recapture any federal
funds that have already been obligated to the greatest
extent possible;

(iii) Report to management council and the joint
appropriations committee on the amount of federal funds
that the state entity will forgo, return or otherwise lose
as a result of this act and on any additional changes to
current law necessary to account for this act.

HB0340

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0766
Section 6.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 5 and 6 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0340